Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 1 General Provisions

13-4-1.
Alteration of written contract — Effect generally.

If a written contract is altered intentionally and in a material part thereof by a person claiming a benefit under it with intent to defraud the other party, the alteration voids the whole contract, at the option of the other party. If the alteration is unintentional or by mistake or in an immaterial matter or not with intent to defraud and if the contract as originally executed can be discovered and is still capable of execution, it shall be enforced by the court. If the alteration is made by a stranger and not at the instance or by collusion of a party or privy and if the original words can be restored, the contract shall be enforced.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2793; Code 1868, § 2801; Code 1873, § 2852; Code 1882, § 2852; Civil Code 1895, § 3702; Civil Code 1910, § 4296; Code 1933, § 20-802.

13-4-2.
Alteration of written contract — Determination of materiality of alteration; determination of fact of alteration.

The materiality of an alteration is a question of law for the court; the fact of an alteration is a question for the jury.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2794; Code 1868, § 2802; Code 1873, § 2853; Code 1882, § 2853; Civil Code 1895, § 3703; Civil Code 1910, § 4297; Code 1933, § 20-803.

13-4-3.
Alteration of written contract — Requirement of preliminary proof as to material alteration.

If the contract is not set forth as the basis of the action, so as to require a denial under oath, an alteration in a material part requires explanation before it can be admitted as evidence. This preliminary proof shall be submitted to the court.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2795; Code 1868, § 2803; Code 1873, § 2854; Code 1882, § 2854; Civil Code 1895, § 3704; Civil Code 1910, § 4298; Code 1933, § 20-804.

13-4-4.
Effect of mutual departure from contract terms.

Where parties, in the course of the execution of a contract, depart from its terms and pay or receive money under such departure, before either can recover for failure to pursue the letter of the agreement, reasonable notice must be given to the other of intention to rely on the exact terms of the agreement. The contract will be suspended by the departure until such notice.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 3642; Civil Code 1910, § 4227; Code 1933, § 20-116.

13-4-5.
Effect of execution of second contract upon same matter; novation.

A simple contract regarding the same matter and based on no new consideration does not destroy another simple contract between the same parties; but, if new parties are introduced so as to change the person to whom the obligation is due, the original contract is at an end.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2686; Code 1868, § 2682; Code 1873, § 2724; Code 1882, § 2724; Civil Code 1895, § 3641; Civil Code 1910, § 4226; Code 1933, § 20-115.

Section incorporates common-law motion of novation. —

Common-law idea of a novation is when A is indebted to B, and B to C, and by mutual agreement B is dropped out, and in consideration of this, A becomes debtor to C. Such agreement constitutes a novation; a new person is introduced to whom obligation is due. Wofford v. Gaines, 53 Ga. 485, 1874 Ga. LEXIS 511 (1874).